Maryland, session 2026, HB1521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “APPLICABLE ZIP CODE” MEANS:
(I) A ZIP CODE DESIGNATED AS A HIGH–CRIME OR
HIGH–POVERTY AREA; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1521*

HOUSE BILL 1521
(II) A ZIP CODE IN BALTIMORE CITY OR BALTIMORE COUNTY.
(3) “AT–RISK YOUTH” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL AT LEAST 12 YEARS OLD
AND UNDER THE AGE OF 25 YEARS OLD WHO:
(I) IS DESIGNATED AS CHRONICALLY ABSENT OR HAS DROPPED
OUT OF SCHOOL;
(II) IS INVOLVED IN THE JUVENILE JUSTICE SYSTEM;
(III) IS INVOLVED IN AN AT–RISK YOUTH PREVENTION OR
DIVERSION PROGRAM, AS DEFINED IN § 8–601 OF THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE;
(IV) IS AGING OUT OR WHO HAS AGED OUT OF FOSTER CARE;
(V) IS EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS; OR
(VI) RESIDES IN AN APPLICABLE ZIP CODE.
(4) “ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN ORGANIZATION THAT
SUPPORTS AT–RISK YOUTH AND IS CERTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
AND THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME PREVENTION AND POLICY UNDER THIS
SECTION, INCLUDING:
(I) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION EXEMPT FROM TAXATION
UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE;
(II) A LOCAL EDUCATION AGENCY;
(III) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT AGENCY;
(IV) A FAITH–BASED ORGANIZATION DELIVERING SECULAR
YOUTH SERVICES; AND
(V) A PUBLIC SCHOOL OR RECREATION CENTER.
(5) “QUALIFIED CONTRIBUTION” MEANS A CASH OR IN–KIND
DONATION MADE TO AN ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION FOR APPROVED PROGRAM
PURPOSES.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION IS TO ESTABLISH A TARGETED STATE
INCOME TAX CREDIT TO INCENTIVIZE PRIVATE CONTRIBUTIONS, VOLUNTEER

HOUSE BILL 1521 3
EFFORTS, AND EMPLOYER HIRING INITIATIVES AIMED AT REDUCING JUVENILE
CRIME AND SUPPORTING YOUTH DEVELOPMENT IN AN APPLICABLE ZIP CODE.
(C) (1) (I) AN INDIVIDUAL OR BUSINESS ENTITY MAY CLAIM A CREDIT
AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO 50% OF A QUALIFIED
CONTRIBUTION TO AN ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATION.
(II) FOR EACH TAXABLE YEAR, THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER
THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT EXCEED:
1. FOR AN INDIVIDUAL, $5,000; OR
2. FOR A BUSINESS ENTITY, $100,000.
(2) (I) IN ADDITION TO THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL WHO VOLUNTEERS TO SPEAK TO
STUDENTS ABOUT THE INDIVIDUAL’S PROFESSION OR YOUTH EMPOWERMENT AT A
PUBLIC SCHOOL OR RECREATION CENTER MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE
INCOME TAX IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO $25 FOR EACH DAY THE INDIVIDUAL
VOLUNTEERS.
(II) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR, THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER
THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT EXCEED $500.
(III) IN ORDER TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR THE CREDIT ALLOWED
UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH, THE INDIVIDUAL MUST:
1. VOLUNTEER AT LEAST 1 HOUR ON THE DAY THE
INDIVIDUAL VOLUNTEERS;
2. BE ACCOMPANIED BY A SCHOOL OFFICIAL AND
SCHOOL SAFETY PERSONNEL WHILE ON SCHOOL GROUNDS; AND
3. RECEIVE A SIGNED AFFIDAVIT FROM THE SCHOOL
PRINCIPAL OR THE PRINCIPAL’S DESIGNEE CERTIFYING THAT THE INDIVIDUAL
VOLUNTEERED.
(IV) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY CLAIM THE CREDIT UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH FOR UP TO TWO SCHOOL VISITS A MONTH.
(3) (I) AN EMPLOYER MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE
INCOME TAX IN THE AMOUNT OF $1,000 FOR EACH AT–RISK YOUTH EMPLOYED BY
THE EMPLOYER DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR.

HOUSE BILL 1521
(II) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR, THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER
THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT EXCEED $5,000.
(III) IN ORDER TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR THE CREDIT ALLOWED
UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH, THE EMPLOYER MUST EMPLOY THE AT–RISK YOUTH FOR
AT LEAST 20 HOURS EACH WEEK FOR:
1. AT LEAST 60 DAYS DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR IF THE
EMPLOYMENT IS PART OF AN INTERNSHIP OR SUMMER PROGRAM; OR
2. AT LEAST 90 DAYS DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR.
(D) THE UNUSED AMOUNT OF A CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION
MAY NOT BE CARRIED OVER TO ANY OTHER TAXABLE YEAR.
(E) (1) BEFORE AN INDIVIDUAL, A BUSINESS ENTITY, OR AN EMPLOYER
MAY CLAIM A CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE INDIVIDUAL, BUSINESS
ENTITY, OR EMPLOYER SHALL APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE FOR
CERTIFICATION OF THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT THAT MAY BE CLAIMED.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE SHALL ESTABLISH AN
APPLICATION PROCESS TO CERTIFY THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT THAT MAY BE
CLAIMED.
(3) FOR EACH TAXABLE YEAR, THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS
CERTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE MAY NOT EXCEED $10,000,000.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE SHALL APPROVE ALL
APPLICATIONS THAT QUALIFY FOR A TAX CREDIT:
(I) ON A FIRST–COME, FIRST–SERVED BASIS; AND
(II) IN A TIMELY MANNER.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME PREVENTION AND POLICY, SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS THAT:
(1) PROVIDE FOR THE CERTIFICATION OF ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATIONS;
(2) DESIGNATE APPLICABLE ZIP CODES;

HOUSE BILL 1521 5
(3) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR APPLICATION FOR, VERIFICATION
OF, AND REPORTING ON THE TAX CREDITS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(4) PROVIDE FOR THE VERIFICATION OF SCHOOL VISIT AFFIDAVITS
FOR VOLUNTEER TAX CREDITS; AND
(5) ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION AND PROVIDE FOR
AUDITING OF TAXPAYERS AND QUARTERLY TRACKING OF TAX CREDIT USAGE.
(G) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER,
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE TAX
CREDITS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REPORT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NUMBER AND AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS AWARDED;
(II) THE NUMBER OF AT–RISK YOUTH SERVED OR EMPLOYED AS
A RESULT OF THE TAX CREDIT;
(III) JUVENILE CRIME STATISTICS IN APPLICABLE ZIP CODES;
(IV) THE IMPACT ON TARGETED COMMUNITIES; AND
(V) ADDITIONAL BENEFITS TO AT–RISK YOUTH THAT HAVE
OCCURRED AS A RESULT OF THE CONTRIBUTIONS MADE UNDER THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING PARTICIPATION IN EVENTS SUCH AS FIELD TRIPS, DEBATES, ART
EXHIBITS, CONCERTS, SPORTS CLINICS, AND BUSINESS COMPETITIONS.
(H) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2031, THE DEPARTMENT OF
LEGISLATIVE SERVICES SHALL CONDUCT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 1,
SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE, AN EVALUATION OF THE TAX CREDIT AUTHORIZED
UNDER THIS SECTION AND SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE TAX
CREDIT EVALUATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, but
before January 1, 2033. It shall remain effective for a period of 7 years and, at the end of
June 30, 2033, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.